Maine, session 132, LD16.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §254, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
7. Prosecutorial District Number 7. There shall be is one district attorney for
Hancock and Washington Counties County, which shall is to be known as "Prosecutorial
District Number 7." The district attorney shall must be elected by the voters of Hancock
and Washington Counties County in the manner set forth in section 251.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §254, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Prosecutorial District Number 9. There is one district attorney for Washington
County, which is to be known as "Prosecutorial District Number 9." The district attorney
must be elected by the voters of Washington County in the manner set forth in section 251.